Florida, session 2026, SB684.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (3) of section 15 319.30, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 16 319.30âDefinitions; dismantling, destruction, change of 17 identity of motor vehicle, vessel, or mobile home; salvage.â 18 (3) 19 (d)âAn electronic signature that is consistent with chapter 20 668 satisfies any signature required under this subsection. 21 However, insurance companies or their authorized agents must 22 implement control processes and procedures acceptable to the 23 department to ensure adequate identity verification and 24 preservation, disposition, integrity, security, confidentiality, 25 and auditability of electronic signatures, except that an 26 electronic signature on an odometer disclosure submitted through 27 an insurance company must be executed using an electronic 28 signature, as defined in s. 668.003(4), which uses a system 29 providing an Identity Assurance Level, Authenticator Assurance 30 Level, and Federation Assurance Level, as described in the 31 National Institute of Standards and Technology Special 32 Publication 800-63-3, as of December 1, 2017, which are 33 equivalent to or greater than Level 2, for each level, for a 34 certificate of destruction or for a salvage certificate of 35 title. 36 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.